Utah statutes.
72-7-203.   License required.

(1)  A person may not establish, operate, or maintain a junkyard, any portion of which is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any interstate or federal-aid primary highway, without obtaining a license from the department under this part.

(2)  A municipality may adopt ordinances, not in conflict with this part, to regulate the creation or maintenance of junkyards of any type within 660 feet of the right-of-way of designated state and federal highways within the jurisdictional limits of the adopting municipality.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules, not in conflict with this part, to regulate the creation and maintenance of junkyards within 660 feet of the right-of-way of designated federal and state highways outside the jurisdictional limits of a municipality.

